Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [504B.247] CREDIT REPORTING REQUIRED. new text end new text begin A landlord who has more than ten residential rental units must offer tenants the option of having their on-time rent payments reported using a rent payment reporting service that allows the landlord to submit the renters' on-time monthly payments to credit bureaus for inclusion in the calculation of a consumer credit score. A renter cannot be required to participate in a rent reporting program. A renter cannot be charged for a rent reporting program. A renter who has agreed to do rent payment reporting can opt out of rent payment reporting at any time, and the landlord must remove the tenant from rent payment reporting within 30 days of the request. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GRANTS FOR TENANT CREDIT REPORTING.new text end new text begin (a) $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for grants to landlords to assist with the cost of providing credit reporting required under Minnesota Statutes, section 504B.247. Grants may be awarded for the cost of services, the purchase of technology and software, and administrative costs directly related to the required credit reporting of on-time rent payments. Priority for grants under this section must be given to landlords with units occupied by tenants who have income at or below 50 percent of the area median income. new text end new text begin (b) The Minnesota Housing Finance Agency must collect data from grantees, and any other willing participants, on the participation in and effectiveness of the on-time rent reporting requirements. By March 1, 2027, the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency must prepare a report and send it to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over housing. new text end